Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.758

DNA identification system—Local law enforcement systems—Limitations.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no local law enforcement agency may establish or operate a DNA identification system before July 1, 1990, and unless:

(a) The equipment of the local system is compatible with that of the state system under RCW 43.43.752;

(b) The local system is equipped to receive and answer inquiries from the Washington state patrol DNA identification system and transmit data to the Washington state patrol DNA identification system; and

(c) The procedure and rules for the collection, analysis, storage, expungement, and use of DNA identification data do not conflict with procedures and rules applicable to the state patrol DNA identification system.

(2) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local law enforcement agency from performing DNA identification analysis in individual cases to assist law enforcement officials and prosecutors in the preparation and use of DNA evidence for presentation in court.

[ 1990 c 230 s 2; 1989 c 350 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Funding limitations—1989 c 350: See notes following RCW 43.43.752.